District of Columbia statutes.
16-4809

Challenging a standby guardianship designation.

(a)

An individual entitled to notice under §§ 16-4501 through 16-4524 (the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act) [repealed] may challenge a standby guardianship designation order by initiating a child custody proceeding in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or in any court that could exercise jurisdiction in accordance with §§ 16-4501 through 16-4524.

(b)

An order of custody issued by a court of competent jurisdiction supersedes any designation of standby guardianship.

June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-152, § 2, 49 DCR 4248